test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vozjyny_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - возьыны: # Verb MONO возьыны 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     возьыны+V+Inf: возьыны
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: возисько
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: возиськод
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: возе
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [возиськом, возиськомы]
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: возиськоды
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: возё

     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg1: возиськы
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg2: возиськы
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg3: возьы
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1: возиське
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2: возиське
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: возё

     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1: возё
     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2: возёд
     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3: возёз
     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [возём, возёмы]
     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2: возёды
     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3: возёзы
     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Sg: возьы
     возьыны+V+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Pl: [возе, возелэ]

     # TODO:
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg1: вози
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg2: возид
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg3: возиз
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl1: [возимы, возим]
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl2: возиды
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl3: возизы
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Sg: возь
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Pl: возе

     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg1: возиськем
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg2: воземед
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg3: возем
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl1: возиськеммы
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl2: возиллямды
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl3: [возиллямзы, возиллям]

     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg1: возиськем
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg2: воземед
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg3: возем
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl1: возиськеммы
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl2: возиллямды
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl3: [возиллямзы, возиллям]

     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg1: возиськымтэе
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg2: возьымтэед
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg3: возьымтэ
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl1: возиськымтэмы
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl2: возиллямтэды
     возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl3: [возиллямтэзы, возиллямтэ]

     возьыны+V+Imprt+Sg2: возь
     возьыны+V+Imprt+Pl2: [возе, возелэ]
     возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: возь
     возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [возе, возелэ]

     возьыны+V+Imprt+Sg3: возёз
     возьыны+V+Imprt+Pl3: возёзы
     возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: возь
     возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3: [возе, возелэ]

     возьыны+V+Opt+Sg1: возём
     возьыны+V+Opt+Sg2: возёд
     возьыны+V+Opt+Sg3: возёз
     возьыны+V+Opt+Pl1: возёмы
     возьыны+V+Opt+Pl2: возёды
     возьыны+V+Opt+Pl3: возёзы
     возьыны+V+Opt+ConNeg+Sg: возь
     возьыны+V+Opt+ConNeg+Pl: [возелэ, возе]

     возьыны+V+Cond+Sg1: возьысал
     возьыны+V+Cond+Sg2: [возьысал, возьысалыд]
     возьыны+V+Cond+Sg3: [возьысал, возьысалыз]
     возьыны+V+Cond+Pl1: возьысалмы
     возьыны+V+Cond+Pl2: возьысалды
     возьыны+V+Cond+Pl3: возьысалзы

     возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg1: возьысал
     возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg2: [возьысал, возьысалыд]
     возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg3: [возьысал, возьысалыз]
     возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: возьысалмы
     возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: возьысалды
     возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: возьысалзы

     возьыны+V+PrcPrfAdn: возем
     возьыны+V+PrcPrfNeg: воземтэе
     возьыны+V+PrcPrfPred: воземын

     возьыны+V+PrcPrsPos: возись
     возьыны+V+PrcPrsNeg: возисьтэм

     возьыны+V+GerPos: возьыса
     возьыны+V+GerNeg: возьытэк
